Washington statutes.
RCW 18.29.140

Approval of educational programs.

The secretary shall establish by rule the standards and procedures for approval of educational programs and may contract with individuals or organizations having expertise in the profession or in education to report to the secretary information necessary for the secretary to evaluate the educational programs. The secretary may establish a fee for educational program evaluation. The fee shall be set to defray the administrative costs for evaluating the educational program, including, but not limited to, costs for site evaluation.

[ 1991 c 3 s 54; 1989 c 202 s 6.]